Washington statutes.
RCW 35.20.120

Expenses of court.

All blanks, books, papers, stationery and furniture necessary for the transaction of business and the keeping of records of the court shall be furnished at the expense of the city, except those expenses incidental to the operation of the court in matters brought before the court because of concurrent jurisdiction with the district court, which expense shall be borne by the county and paid out of the county treasury. All other expenses on account of such court which may be authorized by the city council or the county commissioners and which are not specifically mentioned in this chapter, shall be paid respectively out of the city treasury and county treasury.

[ 1987 c 202 s 196; 1965 c 7 s 35.20.120. Prior: 1955 c 290 s 12.]

NOTES:

Intent—1987 c 202: See note following RCW 2.04.190.